Cellar/aspell/0.60.8/lib/aspell-0.60/hus_affix.dat
SET ISO-8859-1
TRY aersoinltcdmubpágízfvhéjqóñxyúükCMAIESPGJBRFTDVHUOwLKNZÁYXÜÓÚÉÑQWÍ'-

# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# The affix file below is empty on purpose.
# It is thought to generate the Corpus of the TENEK language
# 
# It will be completed with Suffix rules in the final version
#
#    This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify
#    it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
#    the Free Software Foundation.
#
#    This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
#    but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#    MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
#    GNU General Public License for more details. 
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

SFX N Y 2
SFX N   l   chik   'l
SFX N   0   chik   ['abcdefghijklmnopqrstuwyxzáéíóú]

SFX P Y 1
SFX P   0   il   ['abcdefghijklmnopqrstuwyxzáéíóú]

SFX Q Y 1
SFX Q   0   ilchik   ['abcdefghijklmnopqrstuwyxzáéíóú]

SFX T Y 4
SFX T   0   taláb   ['abcdefghijklmnopqrstuwyxzáéíóú]
SFX T   0   talab   ['abcdefghijklmnopqrstuwyxzáéíóú]
SFX T   0   talabil   ['abcdefghijklmnopqrstuwyxzáéíóú]
SFX T   0   talábil   ['abcdefghijklmnopqrstuwyxzáéíóú]

# verbos transitivos
SFX V Y 3
SFX V   0   chik   ['abcdefghijklmnopqrstuwyxzáéíóú]
SFX V   0   kchik   ['abcdefghijklmnopqrstuwyxzáéíóú]
SFX V   0   akchik   ['abcdefghijklmnopqrstuwyxzáéíóú]

# verbos intransitivos
SFX I Y 3
SFX I   0   chik   ['abcdefghijklmnopqrstuwyxzáéíóú]
SFX I   0   ak   ['abcdefghijklmnopqrstuwyxzáéíóú]
SFX I   0   akchik   ['abcdefghijklmnopqrstuwyxzáéíóú]



SFX C Y 16
SFX C   l   malak   [aá]l
SFX C   l   malakchik   [aá]l
SFX C   l   '   [aá]l
SFX C   al  a'chik   al
SFX C   ál  'a   ál
SFX C   al  'achik   al
SFX C   ál   a'chik  ál
SFX C   al  'a   al
SFX C   ál   'achik   ál
SFX C   ál   omchik   ál
SFX C   ál   om   ál
SFX C   ál   máts   ál
SFX C   ál   mámadh   ál
SFX C   ál   mámadhchik   ál
SFX C   ál   omak   ál
SFX C   ál   omakchik   ál

REP 28
REP b v
REP v b
REP á a
REP a á
REP é e
REP e é
REP í i
REP i í
REP ó o
REP o ó
REP ú u
REP u ú
REP ca ka
REP ka ca
REP je ge
REP ge je
REP ke que
REP ce ze
REP ze ce
REP ji gi
REP gi ji
REP ki qui
REP qui ki
REP ci zi
REP zi ci
REP co ko
REP cu ku
REP ku cu
REP ts ch
REP ch ts
